Hawaii, session 2026, HB2477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $33,450,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the fifteenth representative district, as follows: 1.   Kaumualii Highway Construction for Lima Ola and Kaumalii Highway intersection improvements. Construction                 $3,000,000 Total funding                     $3,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 2.   Samuel Mahelona Memorial Hospital Design and construction for renovations of the Samuel Mahelona Memorial Hospital campus, including the demolition of the facilities building and adjacent warehouse buildings to clear space for the new behavioral health facility and parking lot, renovation of a vacant building to accommodate the Adult with Disabilities Day Services Program, renovation of the smoke stack wing of the facilities department, temporary loop road connector driveway, civil engineering design work for the connector road from the hospital to Kuhio Highway, and for the development of workforce housing. Design                       $1,620,000 Construction                $14,980,000 Total funding                    $16,600,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the Hawaii health systems corporation. 3.   Kilauea Radio Repeater Construction and equipment and appurtenances for the Kilauea radio repeater upgrades and associated equipment. Construction                   $200,000 Equipment                      $150,000 Total funding                       $350,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 4.   Wetland and Wildfire Education Center at Kawaiele Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for supplemental funds for the development of the Wetland and Wildfire Education Center at Kawaiele. Plans                            $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                   $497,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                       $500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 5.   Hanapepe Emergency Evacuation Center Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for final designs, plans, environmental assessment, compliance, and permitting for an Emergency Evacuation Center at a new department of land and natural resources baseyard. Plans                          $400,000 Design                         $200,000 Construction                   $200,000 Equipment                      $200,000 Total funding                     $1,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 6.   Westside department of land and natural resources baseyard Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for continued development of the department of land and natural resources Westside Baseyard. Plans                            $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                 $7,997,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                     $8,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 7.   Westside department of land and natural resources offices Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for upgrades to Westside department of land and natural resources offices and infrastructure in Hanapepe, including electrical, plumbing, roof, security system, fencing, and air conditioning improvements. Plans                            $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                   $800,000 Equipment                      $198,000 Total funding                     $1,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 8.   Nounou Mountain Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for upgrades surrounding Nounou Mountain, including Kuamoo bridge, benches, bicycle racks, signage, parking lots, trail improvements, erosion control, and shelters. Plans                            $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                 $2,997,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                     $3,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________